Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7223.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 22-7.4 of the General Laws entitled "Permanent Joint Committee on
Naming All New Buildings, Bridges, Edifices and Other State Constructions" is hereby amended
by adding thereto the following section:
22-7.4-160. The Christine Conrad Lane Memorial Dog Park.
The new coveside dog park located at Haines Memorial State Park in the town of
Barrington, shall be named and known as "The Christine Conrad Lane Memorial Dog Park".
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004376
========